Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HUTCHINSON; LAKE RESTORATION PHASE 2; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Hutchinson for capital improvements and betterments of Otter Lake and Campbell Lake, the south fork of the Crow River, and other tributaries to the lakes in order to improve water quality. The project includes predesign, design, engineering, and construction of capital improvements, including a forebay installation. This appropriation is for Phase 2 of the project. new text end